Alabama, session 2026rs, SB231.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
15 Section 1. Section 29-4-4, Code of Alabama 1975, is
16 amended to read as follows:
17 "§29-4-4
18 (a) Unless provided otherwise by law or applicable
19 legislative rule or policy, security personnel employed by the
20 House of Representatives and the Senate shall be responsible
21 for the security of all of the following:
22 (1) The third, fourth, fifth, sixth, seventh, and
23 eighth floors of the Alabama State House located at 11 South
24 Union Street, such other areas within the Alabama State House
25 as which are occupied or used by the Legislature, and such
26 additional areas outside the Alabama State House in accordance
27 with Section 29-1-19.
28 (2) The new Alabama State House, as coordinated by the
Page 1

(2) The new Alabama State House, as coordinated by the
SB231 Enrolled
29 Secretary of the Legislative Council, the Secretary of the
30 Senate, and the Clerk of the House of Representatives.
31 (3) The legislative parking deck and park located
32 between South Union Street and the new Alabama State House.
33 (4) During any official legislative event, as
34 designated by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate and
35 Speaker of the House of Representatives in coordination with
36 the Alabama State Law Enforcement Agency, held in the State of
37 Alabama away from the Capitol complex.
38 (b) The security officers employed under this chapter
39 shall have the powers of peace officers in this state and may
40 exercise those powers only in the areas designated in
41 subsection (a).
42 (c) The Alabama State Law Enforcement Agency, in
43 coordination with the Legislative Council, shall be
44 responsible for the security of the perimeter and points of
45 entry to the Alabama State House and new Alabama State House
46 as prescribed by the Legislative Council.
47 (d)(1) Every department, agency, and bureau of the
48 State of Alabama shall assist in any manner requested by the
49 Legislature in assuring the security of the areas of the
50 Alabama State House designated in subsection (a).
51 (2) Subsection (c) shall apply to any convening of the
52 Legislature outside of the Capitol or away from the Alabama
53 State House in accordance with Sections 48 or 48.01 of the
54 Constitution of Alabama of 2022, or other applicable law.
55 (e) For purposes of this section, "new Alabama State
56 House" means the building bounded by Pelham Street, South
Page 2

House" means the building bounded by Pelham Street, South
SB231 Enrolled
57 Jackson Street, and Washington Avenue in Montgomery."
58 Section 2. (a) For the purposes of this section, the
59 following terms have the following meanings:
60 (1) ALEA. The Alabama State Law Enforcement Agency.
61 (2) CAPITOL AREA. Any of the following locations:
62 a. The Downtown Capitol Area.
63 b. The Alabama Governor's Mansion and all real property
64 situated between Cromwell Street and Finley Avenue and between
65 Court Street and Perry Street in Montgomery, Alabama.
66 c. Any official residence of the Governor of Alabama.
67 d. Any location designated by the secretary where the
68 House of Representatives, the Senate, the Supreme Court of
69 Alabama, the Alabama Court of Civil Appeals, or the Alabama
70 Court of Criminal Appeals convenes, or will convene, to
71 perform official business.
72 (3) CONDUCTING FLIGHT OPERATIONS. Any of the following
73 actions:
74 a. Manipulating the flight controls of an unmanned
75 aircraft system.
76 b. Acting as a remote pilot in command for a person
77 manipulating the flight controls of an unmanned aircraft
78 system.
79 c. Acting as a visual observer for a person
80 manipulating the flight controls of an unmanned aircraft
81 system.
82 (4) DOWNTOWN CAPITOL AREA. All real property situated
83 between Madison Avenue and High Street and between Lawrence
84 Street and Hilliard Street in Montgomery, Alabama.
Page 3

Street and Hilliard Street in Montgomery, Alabama.
SB231 Enrolled
85 (5) SECRETARY. The Secretary of ALEA.
86 (6) UNMANNED AIRCRAFT. An aircraft operated without the
87 possibility of direct human intervention from within or on the
88 aircraft.
89 (7) UNMANNED AIRCRAFT SYSTEM or UAS. An unmanned
90 aircraft and its associated elements, including communication
91 links and the components that control the unmanned aircraft,
92 that are required for the safe and efficient operation of the
93 unmanned aircraft in the national airspace system.
94 (8) USE. When used in reference to an unmanned aircraft
95 system, any of the following actions:
96 a. Conducting flight operations for an unmanned
97 aircraft system.
98 b. Launching an unmanned aircraft.
99 c. Landing an unmanned aircraft, or otherwise allowing
100 an unmanned aircraft to make contact with any individual or
101 real or personal property.
102 d. Causing an unmanned aircraft to fly.
103 e. Causing an unmanned aircraft to drop any payload.
104 f. Causing an unmanned aircraft system to deploy or
105 discharge an attached weapon, firearm, explosive, destructive
106 device, or ammunition.
107 (9) VICINITY. The area of physical space within 500
108 horizontal feet and 250 vertical feet of the perimeter of a
109 Capitol area.
110 (b)(1) No person shall intentionally use a UAS to
111 conduct surveillance of, or photograph or otherwise record
112 images of, a Capitol area for the purpose of committing a
Page 4

images of, a Capitol area for the purpose of committing a
SB231 Enrolled
113 criminal offense.
114 (2) A violation of subdivision (1) is a Class C felony.
115 (c)(1) No person shall intentionally or knowingly use a
116 UAS in the vicinity of a Capitol area in a manner that
117 interferes with the operations of a Capitol area or causes a
118 disturbance to a Capitol area.
119 (2) A violation of subdivision (1) is a Class C felony.
120 (d)(1) No person shall, without written permission from
121 the secretary, intentionally or knowingly use a UAS within 250
122 horizontal feet and 250 vertical feet of the perimeter of any
123 site of the construction or improvement of state property
124 within a Capitol area.
125 (2) A violation of subdivision (1) is a Class C
126 misdemeanor for a first offense and is a Class B misdemeanor
127 for a second or subsequent offense.
128 (e)(1) On or after January 1, 2027, no person shall
129 intentionally or knowingly use a UAS in the vicinity of a
130 Capitol area.
131 (2) A violation of subdivision (1) is a Class C
132 misdemeanor for a first offense and is a Class B misdemeanor
133 for a second or subsequent offense.
134 (f) None of the following persons shall be subject to
135 the prohibition in subdivision (e)(1):
136 (1) The United States, including any agencies or
137 departments thereof.
138 (2) The State of Alabama, including any agencies or
139 departments thereof.
140 (3) An employee, agent, contractor, or other person
Page 5

(3) An employee, agent, contractor, or other person
SB231 Enrolled
141 acting under the direction or on behalf of the United States
142 or the State of Alabama if the person's use of a UAS is
143 performed within the line and scope of that relationship.
144 (4) A person conducting emergency law enforcement or
145 fire response operations.
146 (5) A person who uses a UAS in accordance with written
147 permission from the secretary, or with a permit issued by the
148 secretary, as established in subsection (g).
149 (g)(1) ALEA may take reasonable and necessary measures
150 against a UAS operating in violation of this section,
151 including all of the following measures:
152 a. Jamming, to the extent consistent with federal law
153 and regulations, including those of the Federal Communications
154 Commission.
155 b. Hacking.
156 c. Physical capture.
157 d. Any other reasonable mitigation measure undertaken
158 to neutralize, intercept, disable, or disrupt a UAS.
159 (2) ALEA may seize a UAS, any part thereof, and any
160 property attached to the aircraft or dropped therefrom if the
161 UAS, any part thereof, or any property attached to the
162 aircraft or dropped therefrom was used in violation of this
163 section.
164 (h)(1) The secretary, by rule, may designate additional
165 locations as a Capitol area and may establish procedures for
166 temporarily designating a location as a Capitol area.
167 (2) The secretary, in consultation with the Governor,
168 the Alabama Legislative Council, and the Alabama
Page 6

the Alabama Legislative Council, and the Alabama
SB231 Enrolled
169 Administrative Office of Courts, may establish by rule
170 permitting procedures for the use of a UAS in the vicinity of
171 a Capitol area.
172 (3) The secretary may adopt any other rules necessary
173 to implement and enforce this section.
174 Section 3. This act shall become effective immediately.
Page 7

Section 3. This act shall become effective immediately.
SB231 Enrolled
175
176
177
178
179
180
181 ________________________________________________
182 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
183
184
185
186 ________________________________________________
187 Speaker of the House of Representatives
188
189
190 SB231
191 Senate 10-Feb-26
192 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
193 the Senate.
194
195 Patrick Harris,
196 Secretary.
197
198
199
200
201 House of Representatives
202 Amended and passed: 05-Mar-26
203
204
205
206
207 Senate concurred in House amendment 10-Mar-26
208
209
210
211
212 By: Senator Givhan
Page 8